Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201544-3903
Continuing education requirements; exceptions.

Sections 44-3901 to 44-3908 shall not apply to the following persons:

(1) Licensees for whom an examination is not required under the laws of this state;

(2) Licensees who sell or consult only in the areas of credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance;

(3) Licensees who sell or consult only in the area of travel insurance; and

(4) Licensees holding such limited or restricted licenses as the director may exempt.

Laws 1982, LB 274, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 48, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 243;

Laws 1990, LB 984, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 34;

Laws 2015, LB458, § 1.
August 30, 2015